Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321G.32, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If a lien has been released by the lienholder, proof of such release may be presented to the county recorder of any county, and the county recorder shall note the release on the face of the certificate of title and enter the release on the statewide computer system. Sec. 2. Section 321I.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If a lien has been released by the lienholder, proof of such release may be presented to the county recorder of any county, and the county recorder shall note the release on the face of the certificate of title and enter the release on the statewide computer system. Sec. 3. Section 462A.84, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If a lien has been released by the lienholder, proof of such release may be presented to the county recorder of any county, and the county recorder shall House File 894, p. 2 note the release on the face of the certificate of title and enter the release on the statewide computer system. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 894, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor